Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1037.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5306.2(a) introductory paragraph of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5306.2. Uniform 911 surcharge.(a) Surcharge imposed.--[Each] Subject to increase and annual adjustment under subsection (a.1), each subscriber or consumer shall pay a surcharge of $1.65 for each 911 communications service or prepaid wireless device for which that subscriber or consumer is billed by a provider or seller as provided for under this chapter. The surcharge shall be collected apart from and in addition to a fee levied by the provider or seller, in whole or in part, for the provision of 911 services. The surcharge shall be subject to the following:123456789101112131415161718 * * *(a.1) Surcharge increase and annual adjustment.--(1) Beginning February 1, 2026, the amount of the surcharge assessed under subsection (a) shall be $2.20.(2) Not later than January 1, 2027, the agency shall adjust the amount specified under paragraph (1), and each year thereafter, the agency shall adjust the amount calculated under this paragraph, as follows:(i) The surcharge amount shall be adjusted by a percentage equal to the upward percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.(ii) The surcharge increase shall be rounded to the nearest 1¢.(iii) The percentage change of the surcharge increase shall be determined by comparison of the figures for the previous June with the current June figures.(iv) The surcharge increase shall be applied to the next successive calendar year. If the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) declines, the amount of the surcharge shall remain unchanged for the successive calendar year.(v) The agency shall, not later than 10 days after determining the surcharge increase, transmit a notice of the determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1037PN1218 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930